Florida, session 2026, SB916.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSubsections (15) through (17) and (18) through 18 (21) of section 331.303, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as 19 subsections (16) through (18) and (20) through (23), 20 respectively, and new subsections (15) and (19) are added to 21 that section to read: 22 331.303âDefinitions.â 23 (15)ââQuintimodal transportation hubâ means a spaceport 24 territory within which interconnected transportation facilities 25 are available to move people or property by means of road, 26 railroad, airport, seaport, and spaceport facilities. 27 (19)ââSpaceport director or commanderâ means the individual 28 designated by the governing body, agency, or military authority 29 of a spaceport territory to administer the operations, 30 maintenance, safety, and local agreements of that facility. 31 Section 2.âSubsections (16) and (17) of section 331.3051, 32 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (17) and (18), 33 respectively, and a new subsection (16) is added to that section 34 to read: 35 331.3051âDuties of Space Florida.âSpace Florida shall: 36 (16)âIn coordination with the Department of Transportation, 37 metropolitan planning organizations, and local governments, 38 enhance and promote the development and use of quintimodal 39 transportation hubs in this state. 40 Section 3.âSection 331.3052, Florida Statutes, is created 41 to read: 42 331.3052âPowers and duties of spaceport operators.â 43 (1)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this part, 44 authority over the operational oversight, management, and day 45 to-day administration of each spaceport shall be vested in the 46 spaceport director or commander for that facility. 47 (2)âSpace Florida shall be responsible for statewide 48 strategic planning, financing, economic development, and 49 intergovernmental coordination, but may not exercise direct 50 control over local operational decisions unless: 51 (a)âSpecifically requested in writing by the spaceport 52 director or commander; or 53 (b)âRequired to comply with applicable federal law or 54 regulation. 55 (3)âEach spaceport shall develop and maintain an 56 operational governance plan consistent with Space Floridaâs 57 statewide strategic plan. Such plan must be submitted annually 58 to Space Florida, but is not subject to approval by Space 59 Florida. 60 (4)âThis section does not diminish Space Floridaâs 61 authority to finance, lease, or own spaceport facilities or to 62 coordinate economic development initiatives across multiple 63 spaceport territories. 64 Section 4.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 65 330.41, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 66 330.41âUnmanned Aircraft Systems Act.â 67 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this act, the term: 68 (b)ââCritical infrastructure facilityâ means any of the 69 following, if completely enclosed by a fence or other physical 70 barrier that is obviously designed to exclude intruders, or if 71 clearly marked with a sign or signs which indicate that entry is 72 forbidden and which are posted on the property in a manner 73 reasonably likely to come to the attention of intruders: 74 1.âA power generation or transmission facility, substation, 75 switching station, or electrical control center. 76 2.âA chemical or rubber manufacturing or storage facility. 77 3.âA water intake structure, water treatment facility, 78 wastewater treatment plant, or pump station. 79 4.âA mining facility. 80 5.âA natural gas or compressed gas compressor station, 81 storage facility, or natural gas or compressed gas pipeline. 82 6.âA liquid natural gas or propane gas terminal or storage 83 facility. 84 7.âAny portion of an aboveground oil or gas pipeline. 85 8.âA refinery. 86 9.âA gas processing plant, including a plant used in the 87 processing, treatment, or fractionation of natural gas. 88 10.âA wireless or wired communications facility, including 89 the tower, antennas, support structures, and all associated 90 ground-based equipment. 91 11.âA seaport as listed in s. 311.09(1), which need not be 92 completely enclosed by a fence or other physical barrier and 93 need not be marked with a sign or signs indicating that entry is 94 forbidden. 95 12.âAn inland port or other facility or group of facilities 96 serving as a point of intermodal transfer of freight in a 97 specific area physically separated from a seaport. 98 13.âAn airport as defined in s. 330.27. 99 14.âA spaceport territory as defined in s. 331.303 s. 100 331.303(19). 101 15.âA military installation as defined in 10 U.S.C. s. 102 2801(c)(4) and an armory as defined in s. 250.01. 103 16.âA dam as defined in s. 373.403(1) or other structures, 104 such as locks, floodgates, or dikes, which are designed to 105 maintain or control the level of navigable waterways. 106 17.âA state correctional institution as defined in s. 107 944.02 or a contractor-operated correctional facility authorized 108 under chapter 957. 109 18.âA secure detention center or facility as defined in s. 110 985.03, or a moderate-risk residential facility, a high-risk 111 residential facility, or a maximum-risk residential facility as 112 those terms are described in s. 985.03(44). 113 19.âA county detention facility as defined in s. 951.23. 114 20.âA critical infrastructure facility as defined in s. 115 692.201. 116 Section 5.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 117 331.310, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 118 331.310âPowers and duties of the board of directors.â 119 (2)âThe board of directors shall: 120 (e)âPrepare an annual report of operations as a supplement 121 to the annual report required under s. 331.3051(18) s. 122 331.3051(17). The report must include, but not be limited to, a 123 balance sheet, an income statement, a statement of changes in 124 financial position, a reconciliation of changes in equity 125 accounts, a summary of significant accounting principles, the 126 auditorâs report, a summary of the status of existing and 127 proposed bonding projects, comments from management about the 128 yearâs business, and prospects for the next year. 129 Section 6.âParagraph (i) of subsection (2) of section 130 692.201, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 131 692.201âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 132 (2)ââCritical infrastructure facilityâ means any of the 133 following, if it employs measures such as fences, barriers, or 134 guard posts that are designed to exclude unauthorized persons: 135 (i)âA spaceport territory as defined in s. 331.303 s. 136 331.303(19). 137 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.